Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-249
Automatic dialing-announcing device; release of telephone line; requirements.

An automatic dialing-announcing device delivering a recorded message to a person shall release the telephone line of the person called within five seconds of the time notification is transmitted to the device that the person called has hung up, or as soon thereafter as the serving telephone company's central office equipment permits, to allow the telephone line of the person called to be used to make or receive other calls.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1213;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 111.